Washington statutes.
RCW 10.01.230

Victim impact panel registry—Panel minimum standards.

(1) The Washington traffic safety commission may develop and maintain a registry of qualified victim impact panels. When imposing a requirement that an offender attend a victim impact panel under RCW 46.61.5152, the court may refer the offender to a victim impact panel that is listed in the registry. The Washington traffic safety commission may consult with victim impact panel organizations to develop and maintain a registry.

(2) To be listed on the registry, the victim impact panel must meet the following minimum standards:

(a) The victim impact panel must address the effects of driving while impaired on individuals and families and address alternatives to drinking and driving and drug use and driving;

(b) The victim impact panel shall have at least two different speakers, one of whom is a victim survivor of an impaired driving crash, to present their stories in person. A victim survivor may be the panel facilitator. The victim impact panel should be a minimum of sixty minutes of presentation, not including registration and administration time;

(c) The victim impact panel shall have policies and procedures to recruit, screen, train, and provide feedback and ongoing support to the panelists. The panel shall take reasonable steps to verify the authenticity of each panelist's story;

(d) Pursuant to (b) of this subsection, the victim impact panel shall use in-person speakers for each presentation for a minimum of sixty minutes of presentation. The victim impact panel may supplement the in-person presentations with prerecorded videos, but in no case shall the videos shown exceed fifteen minutes of presentation;

(e) The victim impact panel shall charge a reasonable fee to all persons required to attend, unless otherwise ordered by the court;

(f) The victim impact panel shall have a policy to prohibit admittance of anyone under the influence of alcohol or drugs, or anyone whose actions or behavior are otherwise inappropriate. The victim impact panel may institute additional admission requirements;

(g) The victim impact panel shall maintain attendance records for at least five years;

(h) The victim impact panel shall make reasonable efforts to use a facility that meets standards established by the Americans with disabilities act;

(i) The victim impact panel may provide referral information to other community services; and

(j) The victim impact panel shall have a designated facilitator who is responsible for the compliance with these minimum standards and who is responsible for maintaining appropriate records and communication with the referring courts and probationary departments regarding attendance or nonattendance.

[ 2016 c 203 s 10; 2011 c 293 s 15.]